New Jersey, session 221, A4787.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section: Age-restricted community means a planned real estate development, as defined in section 3 of P.L.1977, c.419 (C.45:22A-23), consisting of dwelling units governed by a common set of rules, regulations, or restrictions intended and operated for persons 55 years of age or older. Electric public utility or utility means a public utility, as that term is defined in R.S.48:2-13, that distributes electricity to end users within this State. Medical device means any device as defined in subsection (h) of 21 U.S.C. s.321 for use by a person. Power outage means a disruption in service provided by an electric public utility. Powered medical device means any medical device that requires electricity to operate and is necessary for sustaining the health and safety of a person.  Powered medical device includes, but is not limited to, oxygen concentrators, ventilators, and dialysis machines. Wellness check means a visit or telephone call conducted by a law enforcement officer, social worker, or designated caregiver to ensure that a person who relies on a powered medical device is safe and is able to use the powered medical device, if necessary. b.    In the event of a power outage, the utility responsible for providing the electric service interrupted by the power outage shall, on a daily basis until the resolution of the power outage: (1)   in coordination with county officials if applicable, identify and maintain a confidential registry of residents in age-restricted communities who rely on powered medical devices, which registry shall be updated at least annually; (2)   within one hour of the onset of a power outage, prioritize the restoration of power to those individuals on the registry created pursuant to this section; and (3)   if restoration of power is not possible within four hours of the onset of the power outage: (a) conduct or cause to be conducted a wellness check on individuals listed in the registry created pursuant to this section, ensuring the individuals have access to backup power or alternative accommodations; and (b) if after conducting a wellness check, the utility knows that a person listed in the registry created pursuant to this section does not have access to backup power or alternative accommodations, provide backup power supplies, such as portable generators or battery packs, or assist in relocating individuals to facilities with power if necessary. c.     Electric public utilities shall collaborate with county officials, local emergency services, healthcare providers, and community organizations to ensure the wellness checks meet the requirements of this section. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.